Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1527.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-2949, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2949. Exemption from insurance law To the extent that services are provided pursuant to this article, a provider or program contractor is not subject to the provisions of title 20. END_STATUTE